Utah statutes.
77-32-307.   Expenditures of county or municipal funds declared proper --
Tax levy authorized.
(1)  An expenditure by any county or incorporated municipality is considered a
proper use of public funds if the expenditure is necessary to carry out the
purposes defined in this chapter.
(2)  A donation to a nonprofit legal aid or other association charged with the
duty to provide the services is a proper use of public funds.
(3)  Any county or incorporated area of the state is authorized to levy and
collect taxes to meet the requirements of this chapter.
